North Dakota, session 69, SB2233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 32-12.2-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
32-12.2-04. Notice required - Payment of claims.
1. a. A person bringing a claim against the state or a state employee for an injury shall present
to the director of the office of management and budget within one hundred eighty days
after the alleged injury is discovered or reasonably should have been discovered a
written notice of the alleged claim stating the time, place, and circumstances of the
injuryclaim, the names of any state employees known to be involved, and the amount of
compensation or other relief demanded.
b. If the claim is one for serious injury, notice must be presented to the director of the office
of management and budget within one year after the alleged serious injury is discovered
or reasonably should have been discovered. For purposes of this section, "serious injury"
has the meaning as provided in section 26.1 - 41 - 01 .
c. The time for giving the notice does not include the time during which a person injured is
incapacitated by the injury from giving the notice. If the claim is one for death, the notice
may be presented by the personal representative, surviving spouse, or next of kin within
one year after the alleged injury resulting in the death.
c. d . The time for giving the notice is waived for a claim for relief that resulted from sexual
assault, sexual abuse, gross sexual imposition, or any other claim based on a sexual act
or sexual contact as defined in chapter 12.1-20.
2. After receipt of notice of a claim, the director of the office of management and budget shall, in
a timely manner, notify the head of the state entity involved, the attorney general, and any
insurer or self-insurance pool providing coverage for that state entity. For claims over ten
thousand dollars, the director, in consultation with the head of the state entity involved and the
attorney general, may settle claims covered by the state risk management fund if the claim is
made in writing and settlement is approved by the attorney general. The director of the office
of management and budget may independently settle any claim covered by the state risk
management fund if the claim is made in writing and the settlement is for not more than ten
thousand dollars.
3. A claim shall be paid out of the risk management fund unless that claim is covered by
insurance or participation in a government self-insurance pool. All necessary loss adjustment
expenses must be included as a component of the claim and be paid out of the fund. Loss
adjustment expenses include investigation costs and attorney's fees associated with a claim.
4. The acceptance by the claimant of a settlement is final and conclusive on the claimant and
constitutes a complete release of any claim against the state and the state employee whose
act or omission gave rise to the claim.

S. B. NO. 2233 - PAGE 2
5. A person bringing a legal action against the state or a state employee for a claim shall deliver
a copy of the summons, complaint, or other legal pleading in which the claim is first asserted
in the action to the director of the office of management and budget at the time the summons,
complaint, or other legal pleading is served in the action. This provision is in addition to any
applicable rule of civil procedure.

S. B. NO. 2233 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2233.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 3 Absent 3
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State